Idaho statutes. Title 68 TRUSTS AND FIDUCIARIES
Part 6
Miscellaneous Provisions

§ 68-10-601. Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

§ 68-10-602. Severability clause.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

§ 68-10-603, 68-10-604. [Reserved.]

This chapter applies to every trust or decedent’s estate existing on the effective date of this chapter except as otherwise expressly provided in the will or terms of the trust or in this chapter.

§ 68-10-605. Application of chapter to existing trusts and estates.